North Dakota statutes. TITLE 45 Partnerships
CHAPTER 45-22 Limited Liability Partnerships

45-22-01.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Address” means:

In the case of a registered office or principal executive office, the mailing address, including the zip code, of the actual office location which may not be only a post-office box; and

In all other cases, the mailing address, including the zip code.

“Authenticated electronic communication” means:

That the electronic communication is delivered:

To the principal place of business of the limited liability partnership; or

To a partner or agent of the limited liability partnership authorized by the limited liability partnership to receive the electronic communication; and

That the electronic communication sets forth information from which the limited liability partnership can reasonably conclude that the electronic communication was sent by the purported sender.

“Domestic limited liability partnership” means a partnership formed by two or more persons under this chapter with a registration in effect and which is not a foreign limited liability partnership.

“Domestic organization” means an organization created under the laws of this state.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Electronic communication” means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper:

That creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient of the communication; and

That may be directly reproduced in paper form by the recipient through an automated process.

“Electronic record” means a record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means.

“Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and signed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.

“Filed with the secretary of state” means, except as otherwise permitted by law or rule:

That a record meeting the applicable requirements of this chapter, together with the fees provided in section 45-22-23, has been delivered or communicated to the secretary of state by a method or medium of communication acceptable by the secretary of state and has been determined by the secretary of state to conform to law.

That the secretary of state did then:

Record the actual date on which the record was filed, and if different, the effective date of filing; and

Record the record in the office of the secretary of state.

“Foreign limited liability partnership” means a partnership formed by two or more persons as a limited liability partnership under the laws of a jurisdiction other than this state which is in good standing in its jurisdiction of origin.

“Foreign organization” means an organization created under laws other than the laws of this state for a purpose for which the organization may be created under the laws of this state.

“Jurisdiction of origin” means the jurisdiction in which the limited liability partnership status of the foreign limited liability partnership was created.

“Limited liability partnership” means a domestic limited liability partnership or a foreign limited liability partnership.

“Managing partner” means a partner charged with the management of the limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership in this state and if no partners are so specifically designated, then all partners.

“Notice”:

Is given to a limited liability partnership:

When in writing and mailed or delivered to a managing partner at the registered office or principal executive office of the limited liability partnership; or

When given by a form of electronic communication consented to by a managing partner of the limited liability partnership to which the notice is given if by:

Facsimile communication, when directed to a telephone number at which a managing partner of the limited liability partnership or the partner has consented to receive notice.

Electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which a managing partner of the limited liability partnership has consented to receive notice.

Posting on an electronic network on which a managing partner of the limited liability partnership has consented to receive notice, together with separate notice to the limited liability partnership if the specific posting, upon the later of:

The posting; or

The giving of the separate notice.

Any other form of electronic communication by which a managing partner of the limited liability partnership has consented to receive notice, when directed to the limited liability partnership.

Is given to a partner of the limited liability partnership:

When in writing and mailed or delivered to the partner at the registered office or at the principal executive office of the limited liability partnership; or

When given by a form of electronic communication consented to by the partner to which the notice is given if by:

Facsimile communication, when directed to a telephone number at which the partner has consented to receive notice;

Electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the partner has consented to receive notice;

Posting on an electronic network on which the partner has consented to receive notice, together with separate notice to the partner of the specific posting, upon the later of:

The posting; or

The giving of the separate notice; or

Any other form of electronic communication by which the partner has consented to receive notice, when directed to the partner.

Is given in all other cases:

When mailed to the person at an address designated by the person or at the last-known address of the person;

When deposited with a nationally recognized overnight delivery service for overnight delivery or, if overnight delivery to the person is not available, for delivery as promptly as practicable, to the person at an address designated by the person or at the last-known address of the person;

When handed to the person;

When left at the office of the person with a clerk or other person in charge of the office or:

If there is no one in charge, when left in a conspicuous place in the office; or

If the office is closed or the person to be notified has no office, when left at the dwelling house or usual place of abode of the person with some person of suitable age and discretion then residing there;

When given by a form of electronic communication consented to by the person to whom the notice is given if by:

Facsimile communication, when directed to a telephone number at which the person has consented to receive notice;

Electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the person has consented to receive notice;

Posting on an electronic network on which the person has consented to receive notice, together with separate notice to the person of the specific posting, upon the later of:

The posting; or

The giving of the separate notice; or

Any other form of electronic communication by which the person has consented to receive notice, when directed to the person; or

When the method is fair and reasonable when all circumstances are considered.

Is given by mail when deposited in the United States mail with sufficient postage affixed.

Is given by deposit for delivery when deposited for delivery as provided in paragraph 2 of subdivision c, after having made sufficient arrangements for payment by the sender.

Is deemed received when it is given.

“Organization”:

Means, whether domestic or foreign, a corporation, limited liability company, general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability limited partnership, or any other person subject to a governing statute; but

Excludes:

A nonprofit corporation, whether a domestic nonprofit corporation which is incorporated under chapter 10-33 or a foreign nonprofit corporation which is incorporated in another jurisdiction; or

Any nonprofit limited liability company, whether a domestic nonprofit limited liability company which is organized under chapter 10-36 or a foreign nonprofit limited liability company which is organized in another jurisdiction.

“Originally registered” and “original registration” means the record establishing the limited liability partnership status of the foreign limited liability partnership in the jurisdiction of origin of the foreign limited liability partnership.

“Partnership” means an association of two or more persons to carry on as co-owners of a business for profit formed under chapters 45-13 through 45-21, predecessor law, or comparable law of another jurisdiction.

“Principal executive office” means:

An office from which the limited liability partnership conducts business; or

If the limited liability partnership has no office from which the limited liability partnership conducts business, the registered office of the limited liability partnership.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Register” means the act of filing with the secretary of state which causes:

A domestic limited liability partnership to be created; or

A foreign limited liability partnership to be authorized to transact business in this state.

“Registered office” means the place in this state designated as the registered office of the limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership.

“Registration” means the record which, when filed with the secretary of state, causes:

A domestic limited liability partnership to be created; or

A foreign limited liability partnership to be authorized to do business in this state.

“Signed” means:

That the signature of a person which may be a facsimile affixed, engraved, printed, placed, stamped with indelible ink, transmitted by telecommunication or electronically, or in any other manner reproduced on the record, is placed on a record with the present intention to authenticate that record; and

With respect to a record required by this chapter to be filed with the secretary of state means that:

The record is signed by a person authorized to do so by this chapter, or by or pursuant to an agreement among the partners, or by a resolution approved by the affirmative vote of the required proportion or number of partners; and

The signature and the record are communicated by a method or medium of communication acceptable by the secretary of state.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 223; 1999, ch. 95, § 177; 2003, ch. 85, § 154; 2005, ch. 100, § 138; 2007, ch. 354, § 26; 2007, ch. 101, § 75; 2009, ch. 106, § 71.

Law Reviews.

Registration and Operation of North Dakota and Minnesota Limited Liability Partnerships, 72 N.D. L. Rev. 555 (1996).

45-22-01.1.
Legal recognition of electronic records and electronic signatures. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 156.

45-22-02.
Applicability of chapters 45-13 through 45-21.

In any case not provided for in this chapter, chapters 45-13 through 45-21 govern. If any provision of this chapter conflicts with chapters 45-13 through 45-21, that provision of this chapter takes precedence.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 29.

45-22-03.
Registration.

A partnership may become a limited liability partnership pursuant to this section.

In determining whether the underlying partnership necessary for registration as a domestic limited liability partnership has been formed, the rules set forth in section 45-14-02 apply.

The terms and conditions on which a partnership becomes a limited liability partnership must be approved by the necessary vote of partners required to amend the partnership agreement, unless the partnership agreement contains a requirement that the vote of a greater number of partners is necessary to amend provisions relating to the partners’ obligations to contribute to the partnership, in which case by the necessary vote of the partners to amend these provisions.

After the approval required by subdivision b of subsection 1, a partnership shall become a limited liability partnership by filing a registration with the secretary of state. A domestic limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership that is transacting business in this state must have in effect and filed with the secretary of state a registration that complies with this section. From the effective date of filing, the registration of:

A domestic limited liability partnership establishes the status as a domestic limited liability partnership; and

A foreign limited liability partnership authorizes the transaction of business in this state.

A registration, signed by a managing partner, must contain:

With respect to a domestic limited liability partnership:

The name of the domestic limited liability partnership.

The nature of the business to be transacted in this state.

A statement indicating whether the limited liability partnership will be engaged in farming or ranching in this state or owning or leasing land in this state which is used for farming or ranching.

The address of the principal executive office of the domestic limited liability partnership.

The name of the registered agent of the domestic limited liability partnership as provided in chapter 10-01.1 and, if a noncommercial registered agent, the address of that noncommercial registered agent in this state.

The name and address of each managing partner and, if the limited liability partnership will be engaged in farming or ranching in this state or owning or leasing land in this state which is used for farming or ranching, then the names and addresses of all partners.

A statement that the partnership elects to be a limited liability partnership.

A deferred effective date, if any.

With respect to a foreign limited liability partnership:

The name of the foreign limited liability partnership and, if different, the name under which the foreign limited liability partnership proposes to transact business in this state.

The jurisdiction of origin.

The date on which the foreign limited liability partnership expires in the jurisdiction of origin.

The nature of the business to be transacted in this state.

A statement indicating whether the foreign limited liability partnership will be engaged in farming or ranching in this state or owning or leasing land in this state which is used for farming or ranching.

The address of the principal executive office of the foreign limited liability partnership.

The name of the registered agent of the foreign limited liability partnership as provided in chapter 10-01.1 and, if a noncommercial registered agent, the address of that registered agent in this state.

The name and address of each managing partner and, if the foreign limited liability partnership will be engaged in farming or ranching in this state or owning or leasing land in this state which is used for farming or ranching, then the names and addresses of all partners.

An acknowledgment that the status of the foreign limited liability partnership in this state will automatically expire unless the foreign limited liability partnership continuously maintains limited liability partnership status in the jurisdiction of origin.

The registration must be accompanied by payment of the fees provided in section 45-22-22 together with a certificate of good standing or certificate of existence authenticated by the registering officer of the state or country where the foreign limited liability partnership is originally registered.

An original of the registration must be filed with the secretary of state.

If the secretary of state finds the registration conforms to law and the fees provided in section 45-22-22 are paid, the secretary of state shall endorse on the original the word “filed” and the day, month, and year of the filing and shall file the original in the office of the secretary of state.

If any statement in the registration is false when made or becomes inaccurate after the registration is filed, making the registration false or inaccurate in any respect, the limited liability partnership shall file promptly with the secretary of state an amended or corrected registration. If only a change of address of the principal executive office is required, an amended or corrected registration need not be filed. However, the change of address of the principal executive office must be reported in the next annual report filed after the change or be submitted in writing to the secretary of state without a filing fee.

In the case of a change in a foreign limited liability partnership’s name, a foreign limited liability partnership shall file promptly with the secretary of state a certificate to that effect authenticated by the proper officer of the jurisdiction of origin.

In the case of a termination or merger:

A foreign limited liability partnership that is not the surviving organization need not file an amended registration but, within thirty days after the merger or termination becomes effective, shall file with the secretary of state a certificate to that effect authenticated by the proper officer of the foreign limited liability partnership’s jurisdiction of origin.

It is not necessary for any foreign limited liability partnership, which is the surviving organization in a merger, to procure a new or amended registration unless the name of the foreign limited liability partnership is changed or unless the foreign limited liability partnership desires to pursue in this state purposes other than those which the foreign limited liability partnership is authorized to transact in this state.

A managing partner must be separately registered with the secretary of state at the time of the registration of a domestic or foreign limited liability partnership if that managing partner is a domestic or foreign:

Corporation;

Limited liability company;

Limited partnership;

Limited liability partnership;

Limited liability limited partnership; or

Partnership using a fictitious name.

With respect to a domestic limited liability partnership:

A partnership’s decision to file a registration is an ordinary matter that may be decided by a majority of the partners.

The decision to withdraw a registration may be undertaken only with the consent of all partners or as otherwise expressly provided in a written partnership agreement.

A partnership that registers as a limited liability partnership is not deemed to have dissolved as a result of the registration.

If a limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership dissolves without winding up business or changes the jurisdiction of origin, a partnership that is a successor to the limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership and which intends to be a limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership is not required to file a new registration or renewal and is deemed to have filed any documents required or permitted under this section which were filed by the predecessor partnership.

The status of a partnership as a limited liability partnership is effective on the later of the filing of the registration or a date specified in the registration which is within ninety days after the filing of the registration.

The status of a partnership as a domestic limited liability partnership and the authority of a foreign limited liability partnership to transact business in this state remains effective, regardless of changes in the partnership, until the partnership’s registration is voluntarily withdrawn pursuant to section 45-22-13 or revoked by the secretary of state pursuant to sections 45-22-16 and 45-22-21.1.

The status of a partnership as a limited liability partnership and the liability of the partnership’s partners for obligation of the partnership is not affected by errors or later changes in the information required to be contained in the registration under subsection 3.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 51, § 34; 1997, ch. 103, § 224; 1999, ch. 95, § 178; 2001, ch. 403, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 156; 2005, ch. 385, § 1; 2007, ch. 99, § 74; 2009, ch. 106, § 72; 2011, ch. 87, § 69; 2015, ch. 86, § 21, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 92, § 17, effective August 1, 2019.

Law Reviews.

Registration and Operation of North Dakota and Minnesota Limited Liability Partnerships, 72 N.D. L. Rev. 555 (1996).

45-22-04.
Limited liability partnership — Name. [Contingent effective date – See note]

The name of a limited liability partnership:

Must be expressed in letters or characters in the English language as those letters or characters appear in the American standard code for information interchange (ASCII) table.

Must contain the words “limited liability partnership” or the abbreviation “L.L.P.” or the abbreviation “LLP”, either of which abbreviations may be used interchangeably for all purposes authorized by this chapter, including real estate matters, contracts, and filings with the secretary of state.

May not contain the word “corporation”, “company”, “incorporated”, “limited liability company”, “limited partnership”, “limited liability limited partnership”, or an abbreviation of these words.

May not contain a word or phrase indicating or implying the limited liability partnership:

Is formed for a purpose other than:

A lawful purpose for which a limited liability partnership may be formed under this chapter; or

For a purpose stated in its registration; or

May not be formed under this chapter.

Must be distinguishable in the records of the secretary of state from:

The name, whether foreign and authorized to do business in this state or domestic, unless there is filed with the registration a record that complies with subsection 3, of:

Another limited liability partnership;

A corporation;

A limited liability company;

A limited partnership; or

A limited liability limited partnership;

A name, the right to which is at the time of registration reserved in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-14, 10-32.1-12, 10-33-11, 45-10.2-11, 45-13-04.2, or 45-22-05;

A fictitious name registered in the manner provided in chapter 45-11;

A trade name registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-25; or

A trademark or service mark registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-22.

Need not be filed as provided in chapter 45-11 except if transacting business under a name other than the name as registered under this chapter.

The secretary of state shall determine whether a name is distinguishable in the secretary of state’s records from another name for purposes of this chapter and may adopt rules reasonable or necessary for making these determinations.

If the secretary of state determines a limited liability partnership name is indistinguishable in the secretary of state’s records from another name for purposes of this chapter, the limited liability partnership name may not be used unless there is filed with the registration:

The written consent of the holder of the rights to the name to which the proposed name has been determined to be indistinguishable; or

A certified copy of a judgment of a court in this state establishing the earlier right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state.

This section and section 45-22-05 do not:

Abrogate or limit:

The law of unfair competition or unfair practices;

Chapter 47-25;

The laws of the United States with respect to the right to acquire and protect copyrights, trade names, trademarks, service names, and service marks; or

Any other rights to the exclusive use of names or symbols.

Derogate the common law or principles of equity.

A limited liability partnership that is the surviving organization in a merger with one or more organizations, or that acquires by sale, lease, or other disposition to or exchange with a domestic organization all or substantially all of the assets of another organization including its name, may have the same name, subject to the requirements of subsection 1, as that used in this state by any of the other organizations, if the other organization whose name is sought:

Is incorporated, organized, formed, or registered under the laws of this state;

Is authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state;

Holds a reserved name in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-14, 10-32.1-12, 10-33-11, 45-10.2-11, 45-13-04.2, or 45-22-05;

Holds a fictitious name registered in the manner provided in chapter 45-11;

Holds a trade name registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-25; or

Holds a trademark or service mark registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-22.

The use of a name by a limited liability partnership in violation of this section does not affect or vitiate the limited liability partnership’s status as a limited liability partnership. However, a court of this state may, upon application of the state or of an interested or affected person, enjoin the limited liability partnership from doing business under a name assumed in violation of this section, even though the limited liability partnership’s registration may have been filed with the secretary of state.

A limited liability partnership whose registration has expired or whose registration has been forfeited as provided in section 45-22-21.1 may reacquire the right to use that name by refiling a registration as provided in section 45-22-03 unless the name has been adopted for use or reserved by another person, in which case the filing will be rejected unless the filing is accompanied by a written consent or judgment pursuant to subsection 3. A limited liability partnership that cannot reacquire the use of its limited liability partnership name shall adopt a new limited liability partnership name that complies with this section:

By refiling a registration as provided in section 45-22-03;

By amending its registration as provided in section 45-22-03; or

By reinstating the limited liability partnership pursuant to section 45-22-21.1, unless the name has been adopted for use or reserved by another person, in which case the filing will be rejected unless the filing is accompanied by a written consent or judgment as provided in subsection 3.

With respect to foreign limited liability partnerships:

A foreign limited liability partnership may register under any name that would be available to a domestic limited liability partnership, regardless of whether the name is the same under which the foreign limited liability partnership is authorized in the jurisdiction of original registration.

A fictitious name certificate must be filed as provided in chapter 45-11 only if registering under a name other than the name as authorized in the jurisdiction of original registration.

A limited liability partnership that files its registration with an effective date later than the date of filing as provided in subsection 9 of section 45-22-03 shall maintain the right to the name until the effective date.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 225; 1999, ch. 95, § 179; 2003, ch. 85, § 157; 2005, ch. 100, § 139; 2005, ch. 384, § 11; 2011, ch. 87, § 70; contingently amended by 2015, ch. 87, §§
34, 35, effective July 1, 2015; contingently amended by 2019, ch. 93, § 13.

Note.

This section is effective upon receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the secretary of state attesting that all necessary administrative rules and information technology components and systems are ready for implementation of this Act.

45-22-05.
Reserved name.

The exclusive right to the use of a limited liability partnership name otherwise permitted by section 45-22-04 may be reserved by any person.

The reservation is made by filing with the secretary of state a request that the name be reserved:

If the name is available for use by the applicant, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for the exclusive use of the applicant for a period of twelve months.

The reservation may be renewed for successive twelve-month periods.

The right to the exclusive use of a limited liability partnership name reserved pursuant to this section may be transferred to another person by or on behalf of the applicant for whom the name was reserved by filing with the secretary of state a notice of the transfer and specifying the name and address of the transferee.

The right to the exclusive use of a limited liability partnership name reserved pursuant to this section may be canceled by or on behalf of the applicant for whom the name was reserved by filing with the secretary of state a notice of cancellation.

The secretary of state may destroy all reserved name requests and the index thereof one year after expiration.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 226; 1999, ch. 95, § 180; 2003, ch. 85, § 158; 2005, ch. 100, § 140.

45-22-06.
Failure to use required name.

If a person purports to enter into a contract or other undertaking on behalf of a limited liability partnership and with intent to defraud does not disclose to the other party that part of the limited liability partnership’s name that complies with subsection 1 of section 45-22-04, that person is personally liable on the contract or undertaking unless that person can show in making the contract or accepting the undertaking that the other party had knowledge or notice that the partnership was a limited liability partnership, or did not rely on the partnership being an ordinary partnership. Any partner of a limited liability partnership who with intent to defraud consents to a person not making the disclosure described in this section is also personally liable on the contract or undertaking, unless that partner can make the showing described in this section.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 227; 1999, ch. 95, § 181.

45-22-07.
Unauthorized assumption of limited liability partnership powers — Liability.

A person who assumes to act as a limited liability partnership knowing that a registration is not in effect is jointly and severally liable for all debts and liabilities incurred or arising as a result.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 228; 1999, ch. 95, § 182.

45-22-08.
Limited liability partnership shield. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 95, § 207.

45-22-08.1.
Partner liability.

An obligation of a partnership incurred while the partnership is a domestic limited liability partnership, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise, is solely the obligation of the domestic limited liability partnership.

A partner is not personally liable, directly or indirectly, including by way of indemnification, contribution, or otherwise under section 45-19-03, 45-20-06, 45-20-07, 45-21-03, or 45-21-06 or any other basis of law, for an obligation under this section solely by reason of being a partner or acting as a partner.

This section applies notwithstanding any inconsistent provision in the partnership agreement.

This section does not limit or impair the right of a domestic limited liability partnership or the domestic limited liability partnership’s partners to make claims against any particular partner on the grounds that the particular partner has, in the partner’s capacity as a partner, breached a duty to a domestic limited liability partnership.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 95, § 183.

Law Reviews.

Registration and Operation of North Dakota and Minnesota Limited Liability Partnerships, 72 N.D. L. Rev. 555 (1996).

45-22-09.
Piercing the limited liability shield.

With respect to piercing the limited liability partnership shield:

Except as provided in subsection 2, the case law that states the conditions and circumstances under which the corporate veil or limited liability shield of a corporation may be pierced under North Dakota law also applies to limited liability partnerships, taking into account the differences between corporations and partnerships.

The use of informal procedures or arrangements for the management and for the conduct of business is not a ground for piercing the limited liability shield of the limited liability partnership.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27.

Law Reviews.

Registration and Operation of North Dakota and Minnesota Limited Liability Partnerships, 72 N.D. L. Rev. 555 (1996).

45-22-10.
Liability of partners for illegal distributions.

With respect to the liability of partners for illegal distributions:

Except as provided in subsection 3, a partner who receives a distribution from a domestic limited liability partnership which would have been in violation of section 10-19.1-92 had the limited liability partnership been a corporation with a board of directors is liable to the domestic limited liability partnership, the domestic limited liability partnership’s receiver, or other person winding up the domestic limited liability partnership’s affairs, but only to the extent that the distribution received by the partner exceeded the amount that properly could have been paid under section 10-19.1-92.

An action may not be commenced under this section more than two years from the date of the distribution.

A partner actively engaged in the partnership business is not liable to the domestic limited liability partnership for any distribution that is or was regularly paid to the partner on account of engagement in the partnership business to the extent the distribution is reasonable compensation for the partner’s services to or on behalf of the partnership.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1999, ch. 95, § 184.

45-22-11.
Registered office and agent.

A limited liability partnership shall continuously maintain a registered agent as provided by chapter 10-01.1 and, if a noncommercial registered agent, the address of that noncommercial registered agent in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 230; 1999, ch. 95, § 185; 2007, ch. 99, § 75.

45-22-12.
Change of registered office or agent.

A limited liability partnership may change the limited liability partnership’s registered office, change the limited liability partnership’s registered agent, or state a change in the name of the limited liability partnership’s registered agent as provided in chapter 10-01.1.

A registered agent of a limited liability partnership may resign as provided in chapter 10-01.1.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 231; 1999, ch. 95, § 186; 2007, ch. 99, § 76.

45-22-13.
Voluntary withdrawal of status.

A partnership may end the partnership’s status as a limited liability partnership at any time by filing a withdrawal statement with the secretary of state.

The withdrawal statement must contain:

With respect to a domestic limited liability partnership:

The name of the domestic limited liability partnership.

A statement that the domestic limited liability partnership is withdrawing the current registration.

An acknowledgment by the domestic limited liability partnership that the withdrawal ends the domestic limited liability partnership’s status as a limited liability partnership with respect to periods after the effective date of the withdrawal.

With respect to a foreign limited liability partnership:

The name of the foreign limited liability partnership.

The jurisdiction of origin.

A statement that the foreign limited liability partnership is not transacting business in this state as a foreign limited liability partnership.

A statement that the foreign limited liability partnership surrenders authority to transact business in this state as a foreign limited liability partnership and is withdrawing the foreign limited liability partnership’s current registration.

An acknowledgment by the foreign limited liability partnership that the withdrawal ends the foreign limited liability partnership’s authorization to transact business in this state as a foreign limited liability partnership with respect to periods after the effective date of the withdrawal.

A statement that the foreign limited liability partnership consents to service of process based upon any cause of action arising in this state during the time the foreign limited liability partnership was authorized to transact business in this state and that service may be made on the foreign limited liability partnership as provided in section 10-01.1-13.

A post-office address to which a person may mail a copy of any process against the foreign limited liability partnership.

The withdrawal statement may state a delayed withdrawal date. If the withdrawal statement does not state an effective date, the statement is effective when filed.

If the foreign limited liability partnership is not the surviving organization in a merger or termination, the filing with the secretary of state of a certificate to that effect authenticated by the proper officer of the state or country under the laws of which the foreign limited liability partnership is originally registered constitutes a valid withdrawal statement.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 232; 1999, ch. 95, § 187; 2007, ch. 99, § 77.

45-22-14.
Filing after dissolution.

A dissolved limited liability partnership that is winding up affairs may continue the limited liability partnership’s status as a limited liability partnership through termination by continuing to file an annual report until termination.

When the dissolved limited liability partnership winds up affairs, the limited liability partnership shall file with the secretary of state a termination notice, together with the fees provided in section 45-22-22. The termination notice must:

Contain:

The name of the limited liability partnership.

A statement the limited liability partnership dissolved and wound up affairs.

A statement the limited liability partnership is terminated.

Be signed by one former managing partner who did not wrongfully dissolve the partnership or, in the case of a foreign limited liability partnership, by an authorized partner.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1997, ch. 103, § 233; 1999, ch. 95, § 188.

45-22-15.
Limited liability after dissolution.

With respect to limited liability after dissolution:

Subject to section 45-22-14, the limited liability shield described in sections 45-22-08.1 and 45-22-09 continues in full force for the dissolved domestic limited liability partnership regardless of any dissolution, winding up, and termination.

If a domestic limited liability partnership dissolves and the domestic limited liability partnership’s business is continued by a successor partnership under section 45-20-02, the limited liability described in section 45-22-08.1 also applies to that successor domestic limited liability partnership until the withdrawal of the registration that the dissolved domestic limited liability partnership had in effect under section 45-22-03 at the moment of dissolution. The successor partnership may at any time file the partnership’s own registration under section 45-22-03.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 27; 1999, ch. 95, § 189; 2001, ch. 55, § 17.